Alabama, session 2026rs, SB36.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Any Alabama taxpayer who pays municipal
sales and use taxes to an Alabama municipality other than his
or her place of residence may file a petition for refund of
Page 1

or her place of residence may file a petition for refund of
SB36 INTRODUCED
the taxes paid with the municipality based on a process
established by the municipality. The petition for refund may
only be filed once per year.
(b) Any taxpayer seeking a refund of municipal sales
and use taxes paid pursuant to (a) shall maintain records
documenting the amount of sales and use taxes paid to the
municipality. Refunds shall require proper documentation of
amounts of municipal sales and use taxes paid, along with
proof of residency of the taxpayer.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law,
interest due on any refund of municipal sales and use taxes
paid to a municipality under this act shall begin to be paid
by the municipality beginning 90 days after the receipt date
of the properly documented refund petition with interest
accruing beginning on the 91st day.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2